North Carolina statutes. Chapter 143E. The North Carolina Measurability Assessment Act of 2016. [Repealed]
§ 143E-1.
Title. [Repealed]

History.

2016-123, s. 1; repealed by 2021-180, s. 27.2(a), effective July 1, 2021.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 24.1, provides: “The Program Evaluation Division (hereinafter “Division”) is directed to conduct measurability assessments, as provided in Chapter 143E of the General Statutes, and efficiency evaluations of programs and administrative activities of the Department of Administration (hereinafter “Department”) to improve Department accountability reporting and to recommend potential cost savings. Prior to conducting measurability assessments and efficiency evaluations, the Division shall consult with the State Auditor, who shall recommend potential programs or potentially high-cost Department activities that, with changes, may produce cost savings. Taking into account the recommendations of the State Auditor and the results of the measurability assessments, the Division may select a contractor through a noncompetitive bid process to assist the Division in identifying potential cost savings. The State Auditor shall review draft findings and recommendations and shall provide a written response to be included in the Division’s report. By March 30, 2018, the Division shall report its findings and recommendations to the Joint Legislative Program Evaluation Oversight Committee and Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government and, upon request, to other committees.”

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 26.3(a)-(d), as amended by Session Laws 2018-5, s. 26.1(a), and as amended by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 37.5(b), provides: “(a) The General Assembly finds and declares that a nationally recognized cost-benefit analysis model will allow the General Assembly to direct public resources to cost-effective programs that deliver the best outcomes for residents. The Office of State Budget and Management shall receive periodic updates that incorporate new research and enhancements identified through work in participating states and practical technical assistance to implement this cutting-edge approach for identifying policy and budget options. The General Assembly also intends to provide necessary assistance for State agencies to align their individual efforts and resources to achieve statewide priority outcomes.

“(b) The Office of State Budget and Management may consult and work with staff from the Pew-MacArthur Results First Initiative to implement a cost-benefit analysis model for use in crafting policy and budget decisions. The goal of the project is to obtain a model that will help the State invest in policies and programs that can be shown to work.

“State agencies shall provide any information requested by the Office of State Budget and management for purposes of implementing this project. Local government and non-State entities that receive State funds may also be required to provide information to their funding agency or to the Office of State Budget and Management for purposes of implementing this project.

“(c) Repealed by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 37.5(b), effective November 18, 2021, and applicable to reports submitted on or after that date.

“(d) By October 1, 2018, the Office of State Budget and Management, in consultation with Results First partner agencies and the Pew-MacArthur Results First Initiative, shall develop and publish descriptive, formal definitions for tiered-levels of evidence. Each definition shall outline the criteria needed to qualify for each tier of evidence. The Office of State Budget and Management shall also identify which program or service areas will be expected to include evidence and research to support budget proposals. The definitions may be periodically updated as needed. The definitions, and any subsequent updates, shall be included in the annual report required by subsection (c) of this section.”

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2017.’ ”

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 39.4, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 39.6, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2018-5, s. 26.1(b), provides: “The Office of State Budget and Management shall research best practices in performance management from leading states, academia, and nongovernmental organizations and implement a pilot performance management initiative that is designed to inform the budget process and operational management of State programs. By November 30, 2018, the Office of State Budget and Management shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government on the progress of implementing the pilot. The report may include recommendations for additional legislation. For purposes of this section, the term ‘performance management’ means an ongoing process of measuring, evaluating, and adjusting actions to improve outcomes.”

Session Laws
2018-5, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2018.’ ”

Session Laws
2018-5, s. 39.4, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2018-2019 fiscal year, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2018-2019 fiscal year.”

Session Laws
2018-5, s. 39.7, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

§ 143E-2.
Request for measurability assessment. [Repealed]

History.

2016-123, s. 1; repealed by 2021-180, s. 27.2(a), effective July 1, 2021.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

§ 143E-3.
Definition of measurability assessment. [Repealed]

History.

2016-123, s. 1; repealed by 2021-180, s. 27.2(a), effective July 1, 2021.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

§ 143E-4.
Administration of measurability assessment process. [Repealed]

History.

2016-123, s. 1; repealed by 2021-180, s. 27.2(a), effective July 1, 2021.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.